Massachusetts, session 194th, S170.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 100 the following section:-
Section 101. (a) All public buildings shall install and maintain at least one private or
semi-private baby diaper changing station accessible to any caretaker regardless of their sex,
gender, or disability. All places of public accommodation, resort or amusement, as defined in
section 92A of chapter 272, that provide a public bathroom shall install and maintain at least one
private or semi-private baby diaper changing station accessible to any caretaker regardless of
their sex, gender, or disability.
of 2

(b) Signage indicating the location of any baby diaper changing station shall be posted at
or near the entrance of a building or place of public accommodation and at or near any station. If
there is a central directory identifying, for the benefit of the public, the location of offices,
restrooms, and other facilities in the building or public accommodation, that central directory
shall indicate the location of any baby diaper changing stations.
(c) This section applies to: (1) all public buildings; (2) public accommodations
constructed on or after the effective date of this section; and (3) public accommodations existing
on or after the effective date of this section that undergo substantial renovation or remodeling.
This section shall not apply to public accommodations that are generally restricted in age to
those of 13 years or more.
(d) The provisions of this section shall be implemented in compliance with local, state,
and federal laws regarding access for persons with disabilities, and with existing fire, health, and
safety standards.
of 2